Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB245.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 438.305 TO 438.350 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Pipe tobacco" means any tobacco which, because of its appearance, type, packaging, or labeling, is
suitable for use and likely to be offered to or purchased by consumers as tobacco to be smoked in a
pipe; and
(b) "Premium cigar" means a cigar that:
1. Is wrapped in whole leaf tobacco;
2. Contains a one hundred percent (100%) leaf tobacco binder;
3. Is made by manually combining the wrapper, filler, and binder;
4. Has no filter, tip, or nontobacco mouthpiece and is capped by hand; and
5. Weighs more than six (6) pounds per one thousand (1,000) units.
(2) (a) A retailer shall notify a consumer placing an order for any tobacco products, alternative nicotine
products, or vapor products that the shipment or delivery shall not be completed unless the recipient
of the shipment or delivery provides a valid identification document at the time of the shipment or
delivery verifying that the recipient is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, tobacco products shall not include premium cigars or pipe tobacco.
(c) All tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or vapor product containers shipped or delivered to
a consumer shall be conspicuously labeled with the words: "CONTAINS TOBACCO OR NICOTINE
PRODUCTS."
(3) At the time of delivery, the recipient of the shipment or delivery shall present to the individual delivering the
package a valid identification document. Prior to transferring possession of the package, the individual
delivering the package shall visually inspect the document and verify the identity of the recipient and, by
visual examination or by using age verification technology, that the recipient is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age.
(4) Before transferring possession of the package, the individual delivering the package shall obtain the
signature of the recipient of the shipment or delivery. The individual who receives and signs for the tobacco
products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products is not required to be the consumer who purchased
the tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
(5) A retailer or common or private carrier that fails to comply with this section shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500); and
(b) For each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars
($1,000).
(6) A consumer who intentionally causes an unlawful shipment or delivery under this section shall:
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250);
and
(b) For each subsequent offense, be guilty of a violation punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars
($500).
The retailer and the common or private carrier shall not be liable for a violation of this subsection.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) If a common or private carrier is unable to complete delivery under this section, the tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products shall be returned to the retailer.
(8) For purposes of this section, tobacco products shall not include premium cigars or pipe tobacco.
(9) This section shall not be construed to authorize any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to order,
purchase, receive, or use tobacco products.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 438.305 TO 438.350 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The annual license application required in Section 5 of this Act shall contain only the following
information, given under oath:
(a) The name, age, Social Security number, federal employer identification number, telephone number,
email address, business address, and citizenship of each applicant;
(b) If the applicant is a partner, the name, age, Social Security number, business address, and
citizenship of each partner and the name and address of the partnership;
(c) The name, age, Social Security number, business address, residence, and citizenship of each
individual or partner interested in the business for which the license is sought, together with the
nature of that interest, and, if the applicant is a corporation, limited partnership company, limited
liability company, or other business entity recognized by law, the name, age, Social Security number,
and address of each principal owner, member, officer, and director of the applicant. The department
may require the names of all owners and the ownership percentage held by each;
(d) The premises to be licensed, stating the street and number, if the premises has a street number, and a
description that will reasonably indicate the location of the premises;
(e) 1. Proof of occupancy, to include:
a. A copy of the lease or deed for the premises to be licensed, if not currently on file with
the department under a license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 243; or
b. Certification from a landlord or landowner stating that the property can be used for the
purpose in which the application has been filed for the premise to be licensed.
2. If a change of ownership requires a resubmission pursuant to Section 5 of this Act, a copy of
the revised lease or deed or certificate from a landlord or landowner for the premises to be
licensed shall be included;
(f) Proof of registration with the Department of Revenue pursuant to KRS 139.390; and
(g) 1. A statement that neither the applicant nor any other person referred to in this section has been
convicted of:
a. Any misdemeanor directly or indirectly attributable to the sale of illicit substances or
illegal tobacco, nicotine, or vapor products;
b. Any violation involving a controlled substance that is described in or classified pursuant
to KRS Chapter 218A within the two (2) years immediately preceding the application;
c. Any felony within five (5) years from the later of the date of parole or the date of
conviction; or
d. Knowingly providing false information to the department preceding the application.
2. A statement that the applicant or any other person referred to in this section has not had any
license that has been issued under KRS Chapter 438 revoked for cause within two (2) years
prior to the date of the application.
(2) (a) The renewal license form required in Section 5 of this Act shall only provide for information in the
event of a material change.
(b) As used in this subsection, "material change" means:
1. A change of:
a. Ownership;
b. Lease or deed status; or

CHAPTER 70 3
c. Business address; and
2. Any civil or criminal violations.
(3) If, after a license has been issued, there is a change in any of the facts required to be set forth in the
application, a verified supplemental statement in writing giving notice of the change shall be filed with the
department within ten (10) days after the change.
(4) In giving any notice or taking any action in reference to a license, the department may rely upon the
information furnished in the application or in the supplemental statement connected with the application as
accurate and truthful. The information required to be furnished in the application or supplemental
statement shall be deemed material in any prosecution for perjury.
(5) The department shall not have the authority to establish any additional requirements for licensure or
licensure renewal beyond those statutorily required.
(6) (a) Within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this Act, the department shall publish and maintain on
its website the required application, renewal form, and instructions for an annual tobacco, nicotine,
or vapor product license.
(b) The application, renewal form, and instructions shall:
1. Be public-facing;
2. Be published outside of the department's licensure portal;
3. Not require a person to log into an account for access; and
4. Have a quick link for easy access on a main tab or section of the department's website.
Section 3. KRS 438.306 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each retailer shall, upon organizational filing or application for certificate of authority to the Secretary of State
and upon its annual report, state whether it is involved in the retail sale of authorized nicotine vapor products.
(2) The Secretary of State shall:
(a) Create a list of retailers that sell authorized nicotine vapor products;[ and]
(b) Provide the list of retailers created under paragraph (a) of this subsection to the department and the
Department of Revenue on a monthly basis; and
(c) Prior to June 30 of each calendar year, as a part of the electronic notification reminder to each
business to submit its annual report, notify retailers that a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license
is required to sell authorized nicotine vapor products.
Section 4. KRS 438.3061 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person, firm, or corporation shall not operate as a retailer selling alternative nicotine products, tobacco
products, or authorized nicotine vapor products in or on any premises in the Commonwealth without first
obtaining a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license issued by the department. The department may issue:
(a) A tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license that may be renewed annually;
(b) 1. A temporary tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license for use at fairs, festivals, and other
similar events.
2. A temporary license issued under this paragraph shall be valid for no more than thirty (30)
days.
3. The department shall approve or deny every application for a temporary tobacco, nicotine, or
vapor product license within fourteen (14) business days; and
(c) Any other special or temporary license the department deems necessary.
(2) (a) Any person who, by himself or herself or through another, directly or indirectly, violates subsection (1)
of this section shall be subject to the penalties in KRS 243.990(2).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) On and after November 1, 2026, the department shall confiscate all alternative nicotine products,
tobacco products, or authorized nicotine vapor products from any person, firm, or corporation that
violates subsection (1) of this section.
Section 5. KRS 438.3063 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Each applicant shall apply[application] for an initial[a] tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product
license on[shall be made in] a form prescribed by the department in accordance with Section 2
of this Act, accompanied with a nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50)[ and any
supporting documentation required by the department].
2. The department shall have the form published to its website within thirty (30) days of the
effective date of this Act.
(b) The application fee shall be applied to the licensing fee if the license is issued. If no license is issued,
the licensing fee required in subsection (4) of this section shall be refunded to the applicant and the
application fee shall be retained by the department.
(2) A tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license shall:
(a) Be accompanied with a licensure renewal form for an annual license and a licensing fee required in
subsection (4) of this section[renewed annually];
(b) Remain in full force and effect for one (1) year from the date of issuance for an annual license and for
thirty (30) days for a temporary license unless it is surrendered by the licensee, suspended, or revoked;
and
(c) Be posted in a conspicuous place in the location[premises] of the business where alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or authorized nicotine vapor products are sold.
(3) (a) As used in this subsection, "batch license" means to apply for or renew:
1. Multiple tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product licenses for multiple premises; or
2. A tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license, or multiple licenses for multiple premises, in
conjunction with one (1) or more licenses authorized under KRS Chapter 243.
(b) 1. A retailer with a license issued by the department and operating under KRS Chapter 243 may
initiate the application process to obtain a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license on the date
of its next alcohol license renewal or renew a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license on the
date of its next alcohol license renewal.
2. An applicant seeking to obtain a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license or a licensee
seeking to renew a license may batch license using a singular application or renewal form
pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection.
3. A licensee may batch license:
a. On the date of its next alcohol licensure renewal pursuant to KRS Chapter 243; or
b. One (1) year from the date of issuance of its tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license.
4. If an applicant or licensee chooses to batch license, the fee required in subsection (4) of this
section shall be multiplied by the number of premises to be licensed or premises to be renewed.
(c) The department shall provide a singular application option and a singular renewal form option for
businesses or retailers seeking to batch license.
(d) A retailer or business seeking annual licensure may choose not to batch license and may apply for its
tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license individually on any date throughout the calendar year
and renew its license one (1) year from the date of issuance.
(4) (a) The fee for an annual[a] tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license shall be five hundred dollars
($500) per year for each licensed premises and the fee shall be made payable to the State Treasury.
(b) The fee for a thirty (30) day temporary tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license shall be fifty
dollars ($50) for each event, and the fee shall be made payable to the State Treasurer.
(c) All of the fees paid into the State Treasury for state licenses shall be credited to a revolving trust and
agency account as provided in KRS 438.337 for the department.

CHAPTER 70 5
(5) (a) Prior to denial or notification of failure to renew, if the department identifies any error or omission
in any application submitted for issuance or renewal of a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license:
1. The department shall notify the applicant of the error within seven (7) business days of its
discovery;
2. The applicant shall be granted a grace period of thirty (30) days for correction; and
3. The department shall review the correction within seven (7) business days of the submitted
correction.
(b) The department shall issue the license or permit within fourteen (14) business days of the date the
application is complete.
(6) The tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license shall not be transferred from one (1) person to another or from
one (1) premises to another premises.
(7)[(6)] (a) If a retailer has a change of ownership, the new owner shall provide written notice to the
department of the change in ownership no later than fifteen (15) days prior to the transaction or sale
closing, and the notice shall include:
1. The initial licensing application established in subsection (1) of this section; and
2. The licensing fee required in subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The department shall issue the license within fourteen (14) business days of the date the notice and
application is received[A new tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license shall be required when a
retailer has a change in ownership].
Section 6. KRS 438.3067 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in subsections (5) and (7) of Section 5 of this Act, the commissioner shall approve
or deny every application for a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license within fourteen (14)
business days.
(b) If a retailer has submitted an application and the department has not issued a license or denial, or
notified of failure to renew within fourteen (14) business days, a retailer shall not be subject to any
penalties during or after the required fourteen (14) business days until the department has issued the
license or denial, or notified of failure to renew to the retailer.
(2) A license shall only be denied if the:
(a) 1. Application required in Section 5 of this Act is incomplete; and
2. Applicant has been given the opportunity to correct an application as required in Section 5 of
this Act;
(b) Licensing fee required in Section 5 of this Act is not remitted with the application;
(c) Applicant or business owners are not twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(d) Applicant or business owners have a tax delinquency due to the Department of Revenue, unless the
applicant or business owners have an approved payment agreement with the Department of Revenue;
or
(e) Applicant has committed any act for which a license would be revoked pursuant to Section 7 of this
Act.
(3) If the application is denied, the:
(a) License shall not be issued;
(b) Applicant shall be notified of the commissioner's denial, which shall include the reason for the denial;
and
(c) Applicant may, within thirty (30) days, appeal the denial and request an administrative hearing on the
matter in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4)[(3)] (a) If the commissioner revokes a license pursuant to KRS 438.3069, the commissioner shall:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Notify the applicant within ten (10) days of the decision to revoke the license; and
2. Upon the request of a denied licensee, commence a hearing on the license revocation in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(b) Revocation of a license subject to KRS 438.305 to 438.350, as it relates to the regulation of alternative
nicotine products, tobacco products, and vapor products, for any reason shall result in the inability of a
retailer to reapply for a license for two (2) years.
(c) 1. A final order of the commissioner shall be appealable to the Franklin Circuit Court.
2. The licensee may, within thirty (30) days, appeal the final order and request an administrative
hearing on the matter in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 7. KRS 438.3069 is amended to read as follows:
A license may be revoked or suspended by the commissioner for a violation of:
(1) Any of the provisions of KRS 438.305 to 438.350, as they relate to the regulation of alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, and vapor products, except as provided in Section 8 of this Act and KRS
438.312, in which the schedule of penalty of each respective statute shall be followed;
(2) Any administrative regulation of the department relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and
transportation of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, or vapor products;
(3) Any administrative regulation of the Department of Revenue relating to the taxation of alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, or vapor products;
(4) Any Act of Congress or any rule or regulation of any federal board, agency, or commission; or
(5) [Any of the laws, regulations, or ordinances referred to in this section when an agent, servant, or employee of
the licensee committed the violation, irrespective of whether the licensee knew of or permitted the violation or
whether the violation was committed in disobedience of the licensee's instructions;
(6) Any cause which the department in the exercise of its sound discretion deems sufficient; or
(7) ]Any of the reasons for which the commissioner would have been required to deny a license if existing
material facts had been known.
Section 8. KRS 438.310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not sell or cause to be sold any tobacco product or alternative nicotine product at retail to
any person under the age of twenty-one (21), or solicit any person under the age of twenty-one (21) to
purchase any tobacco product or alternative nicotine product at retail.
(2) Any person who sells tobacco products or alternative nicotine products at retail shall cause to be posted in a
conspicuous place in his or her establishment a notice stating that it is illegal to sell tobacco products,
alternative nicotine products, or vapor products to persons under age twenty-one (21).
(3) Any person selling tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products shall require proof of age
from a prospective buyer or recipient if the person has reason to believe that the prospective buyer or recipient
is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(4) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be subject to a:
(a) One hundred dollar ($100) fine to the retail sales clerk for a first citation and a notice to the owner of a
retail establishment which details the violation;
(b) One hundred dollar ($100) fine to the retail sales clerk and an additional five hundred dollar ($500) fine
to the owner of a retail establishment for a second citation;
(c) One hundred dollar ($100) fine to the retail sales clerk and an additional one thousand dollar ($1,000)
fine to the owner of a retail establishment for a third citation; and
(d) Revocation of the tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license upon a fourth citation. Revocation for any
fourth and subsequent citation within a two (2) year period shall result in the inability to reapply for a
license for two (2) years.
(5) Each citation shall be specific to the premises of the retail establishment where the violation occurred.
(6) The fine shall be imposed and collected by the department using a civil enforcement procedure.

CHAPTER 70 7
(7) A retailer shall be prohibited from renewing its license until all fines incurred under KRS 438.305 to 438.350
as they relate to the regulation of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, and vapor products are
paid.
Section 9. KRS 438.316 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A retailer of nicotine vapor products containing nicotine shall only sell authorized nicotine vapor products.
(2) Any retailer that violates this section shall be subject to a:
(a) Five hundred dollar ($500) fine to the owner of a retail establishment for a first citation issued for a
violation of this section;
(b) One thousand dollar ($1,000) fine to the owner of a retail establishment for a second or subsequent
citation issued for a violation of this section; and
(c) Revocation of the tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license upon a fourth citation, which shall result
in the inability to reapply for a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license for two (2) years.
(3) Each citation shall be specific to the premises of the retail establishment where the violation occurred.
(4) Any retailer with unpaid fines under this section that are more than sixty (60) days overdue shall lose the
ability to lawfully sell vapor products until the fines are paid.
(5) A retailer shall have an affirmative defense to a violation of selling an unauthorized vapor product if the
retailer can establish:
(a) Proof of an official material change in the status of a vapor product under review by the FDA within
forty-five (45) days of the issuance of the citation; or
(b) Proof received under KRS 438.308(1)(b) that the product is an authorized nicotine vapor product.
Section 10. KRS 438.330 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 438.337, the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control and the Department of
Agriculture shall carry out annually conducted random, unannounced inspections of retail establishments
where tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products are sold or distributed for the purpose
of enforcing the provisions of KRS 438.305 to 438.350 as they relate to the regulation of alternative nicotine
products, tobacco products, and vapor products. The inspections shall be conducted to the extent necessary to
assure that the Commonwealth remains in compliance with Pub. L. No. 102-321 and applicable federal
regulations. The department and the Department of Agriculture shall also ensure that targeted inspections are
conducted at those retail establishments where, and at those times when, persons under the age of twenty-one
(21) years are most likely to purchase tobacco products, alternative nicotine products, or vapor products.
Persons under the age of twenty-one (21) years may be used to test compliance with the provisions of KRS
438.305 to 438.350 as they relate to the regulation of alternative nicotine products, tobacco products, and
vapor products only if the testing is conducted under the direct supervision of the department, sheriff, or chief
of police, or their employees, and written parental consent has been obtained. The department shall prepare
annually, for submission by the Governor to the secretary of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services, the report required by Section 1926 of Subpart 1 of Part B of Title XIX of the Federal Public
Health Service Act.
(2) The department shall develop and implement the survey sampling methodologies to carry out the inspections
as described in this section.
Section 11. KRS 438.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department and the Department of Agriculture are authorized to promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to implement and carry out the provisions of KRS 438.305 to
438.350, including establishing a procedure for administering citations, issuing orders, adjusting fees, and
filing appeals under this section and KRS 438.3067 for any violation of the provisions of KRS 438.305 to
438.350, order of the commissioner, or administrative regulations promulgated by the department.
(2) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to tobacco, nicotine, and vapor
licensing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 438.305 TO 438.350 IS CREATED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) The temporary license application required in Section 5 of this Act shall contain only the following
information, given under oath:
(a) The name, age, Social Security number, federal employer identification number, telephone number,
email address, business address, and citizenship of each applicant;
(b) If the applicant is a partner, the name, age, Social Security number, business address, and
citizenship of each partner and the name and address of the partnership;
(c) The name, age, Social Security number, business address, residence, and citizenship of each
individual or partner interested in the business for which the license is sought, together with the
nature of that interest, and, if the applicant is a corporation, limited partnership company, limited
liability company, or other business entity recognized by law, the name, age, Social Security number,
and address of each principal owner, member, officer, and director of the applicant. The department
may require the names of all owners and the ownership percentage held by each;
(d) A description of the location of the fair, festival, or other event that reasonably indicates where at the
event location the products will be sold;
(e) Proof of the occurrence and duration of the fair, festival, or other event where the products will be
sold; and
(f) 1. A statement that neither the applicant nor any other person referred to in this section has been
convicted of:
a. Any misdemeanor directly or indirectly attributable to the sale of illicit substances or
illegal tobacco, nicotine, or vapor products;
b. Any violation involving a controlled substance that is described in or classified pursuant
to KRS Chapter 218A within the two (2) years immediately preceding the application;
c. Any felony within five (5) years from the later of the date of parole or the date of
conviction; or
d. Knowingly providing false information to the department preceding the application.
2. A statement that the applicant or any other person referred to in this section has not had any
license that has been issued under KRS Chapter 438 revoked for cause within two (2) years
prior to the date of the application.
(2) If, after a license has been issued, there is a change in any of the facts required to be set forth in the
application, a verified supplemental statement in writing giving notice of the change shall be filed with the
department within ten (10) days after the change.
(3) In giving any notice or taking any action in reference to a license, the department may rely upon the
information furnished in the application or in the supplemental statement connected with the application as
accurate and truthful. The information required to be furnished in the application or supplemental
statement shall be deemed material in any prosecution for perjury.
(4) The department shall not have the authority to establish any additional requirements for licensure or
licensure renewal beyond those statutorily required.
(5) (a) Within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this Act, the department shall publish and maintain on
its website the required application, renewal form, and instructions for a temporary tobacco, nicotine,
or vapor product license.
(b) The application, renewal form, and instructions shall:
1. Be public-facing;
2. Be published outside of the department's licensure portal;
3. Not require a person to log into an account for access; and
4. Have a quick link for easy access on a main tab or section of the department's website.
Section 13. The following KRS section is repealed:
438.3065 Transitional license.

CHAPTER 70 9
Section 14. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, this Act shall not be construed to delay enforcement
of Sections 8, 9, or 10 of this Act or KRS 438.311, 438.315, or 438.3071.
Section 15. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including 2026 RS SB 145/EN:
(1) Within 60 days of the effective date of this Act, any retailer selling tobacco, nicotine, or vapor products
in Kentucky that does not hold a tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license required by this Act shall remit the initial
application form and the licensing fee required in Section 5 of this Act to the department to obtain an initial license;
(2) If a retailer is approved, the department shall issue a license within 14 business days; and
(3) If a retailer is licensed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the retailer shall renew annually on the
date of issuance unless the retailer elects to renew by batch license pursuant to Section 5 of this Act.
Section 16. Any licensee who has obtained a tobacco, nicotine, and vapor product license under KRS
438.305 to 438.350 in calendar year 2025 shall have the licensing fee of five hundred dollars ($500) paid in calendar
year 2025 credited to the licensee's upcoming licensing fee payment for licensure renewal in calendar year 2026.
Licensees not seeking renewal shall not receive a refund or credit and the licensing fee paid in calendar year 2025
shall be retained by the department.
Section 17. Sections 1 to 12 of this Act shall not modify, invalidate, or otherwise negatively affect a
tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license that:
(1) Was issued by the department prior to July 1, 2026; and
(2) Remains in good standing with the department on July 1, 2026.
Section 18. Sections 2 to 10 of this Act shall be retroactive to January 1, 2026.
Section 19. Whereas the proper regulation and licensing of tobacco, nicotine, and vapor products are
crucial for public safety and protection, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage
and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version